morphology/ex/grn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>                   ! Frontera de morfema
%<n%>                ! Nombre
%<gen%>              ! Genetivo
%<loc%>              ! Locativo
%<subs%>	     ! Substantivante
%<num%>		     ! Número
%<comp%>	     ! Comparativo
%<pl%>		     ! Plural
%-


!!!!!!!ARCHIPHONEMES!!!!!!!!
%{m%}              ! Archiphoneme for m in case
%{d%}		   ! Archiphoneme for nasal in digits
%{s%}		   ! Archiphoneme to cancel nasalization
%{N%}
%{K%}

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
Nouns-Spa;
DIGITLEX ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;
%<n%>: SUBS ;
%<n%>: COMP ;
%<n%>: PL ;

LEXICON CASE

%<gen%>:%>gui #; ! "de"
%<loc%>:%>%{m%}e #; ! "a, en"
# ;

LEXICON PL
%<pl%>:%>%{N%}%{K%}uéra # ;

LEXICON COMP

%<comp%>:%>icha #; 

LEXICON SUBS

%<subs%>:%>kue # ;

LEXICON Nouns-Spa

asociación:asociación%{s%} N ;
declaración:declaración%{s%} N ;
araña:araña N ;


LEXICON Nouns

ava:ava N ; ! "raza, gente"
óga:óga N ; ! "casa"
irũ:irũ N ; ! "amigo"
apyka:apyka N ; ! "silla"
tembiasa:tembiasa N ; ! "experiencia"
akãvai:akãvai N ; ! "locura"
ja:ja N ; ! ""
jagua:jagua N ; ! ""

LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>:%- CASE ;


LEXICON LOOP

LAST-DIGIT ; 
DIGITLEX ; 


LEXICON LAST-DIGIT

1:1%{d%} NUM-DIGIT ; !"peteĩ"
3:3 NUM-DIGIT ; !"mbohapy"


LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;
